Tennessee, session 114, HB1927.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Section 4 of Chapter 7 of the Public Acts of the First Extraordinary Session
of 2025, is amended by deleting subsection (f) and substituting instead the following:
(f)
(1) Subject to appropriation and notwithstanding subdivision (b)(2), if, on
the effective date of this act, a local board of education or public charter school
governing body has not received funding from the department for purposes of
this section and the local board or governing body adopts the resolution required
in subsection (b) and submits the resolution to the department by June 1, 2026,
then the department shall award a one-time bonus in an amount that is no less
than two thousand dollars ($2,000) to each teacher who was employed in the
LEA or public charter school in the 2024-2025 school year.
(2) If a teacher who was employed by the LEA or public charter school in
the 2024-2025 school year is not employed by the LEA or public charter school
when any funds are received from the department for purposes of this subsection
(f), then the amount of any bonus that would have been awarded to such teacher
must be distributed among the teachers who were employed by the LEA or public
charter school in the 2024-2025 school year and who are employed by the LEA
or public charter school when any funds are received from the department for
purposes of this subsection (f). A teacher who was not employed in a
HB1927
010920
- 1 -

kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) public school for the 2024-2025 school
year is not eligible to receive a one-time bonus pursuant to this subsection (f).
(g) For purposes of this section, "teacher" has the same meaning as "existing
educator," as that term is defined in § 49-3-104.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010920